en: Breaded halloumi
fr: Halloumi panés

en: Mozzarella sticks
de: Mozzarella-Sticks
es: Palitos de mozzarella
fi: Mozzarellatikut
fr: Sticks à la Mozzarella, Batonnets de Mozzarella
hr: Štapići od mozzarelle
ja: モッツァレラスティック
nl: Mozzarella sticks

en: Cheese and ham breaded
fr: Fromage pané au jambon

en: Frozen cheeses
fr: Fromages surgelés

en: Breaded vegetable patties
fr: Galettes de légumes panées
hr: Pohane pljeskavice od povrća
nl: Gepaneerde groenteschijven
pl: Panierowane kotlety warzywne

en: Breaded Bami patties
fr: Tranches de Bami panées
hr: Pohane bami pljeskavice
nl: Bamischijven

en: Kroketten
fr: Croquettes hollandaises
nl: Kroketten

en: Frozen kroketten
fr: Croquettes hollandaises surgelées

en: Breads
bg: Хляб
ca: Pans
da: Brød
de: Brote, Brot
es: Panes, Pan
fi: leivät
fr: Pains, pain
he: לחמים
hr: kruhovi, kruh
hu: Kenyerek
it: Pani, Pane
ja: パン
lt: Duona, Duonos
nl: Broden, Brood
pl: Chleb, pieczywo
pt: Pães, pão
ro: Pâini, Pâine
ru: Хлеб
sv: Bröd
th: กลุ่มผลิตภัณฑ์ขนมปัง
tr: Ekmek
zh: 面包

en: Frozen breads
de: Tiefkühlbrote
es: Pan congelado
fr: Pains surgelés
hr: Smrznuti kruhovi
lt: Šaldytos duonos
nl: Diepvriesbrood

en: Ciabattas, Ciabatta
xx: Ciabatta, Ciabattas
ar: شباتة
be: Чыябата
bg: Чабата
ca: Xapata
da: Ciabattabrød
el: Τσιαμπάτα
eu: Txapata
hi: चबाटा
hy: Չիաբատտա
it: Ciabatte
ja: チャバッタ
ka: Ჩიაბატა
ko: 치아바타
lt: Čiabata
lv: Čabata
nb: Ciabattaer
nn: Ciabattaer, Ciabattaar
ru: Чиабатта
sr: Ћабата
sv: Ciabattor
uk: Чіабата
zh: 拖鞋麵包

en: Plain ciabattas
sv: Naturella ciabattor

en: Ciabattas with olives
da: Ciabattabrød med oliven
sv: Ciabattor med oliv

en: Pinsa breads
it: Pinsa

en: Breads with nuts, Nut breads
de: Nussbrote
es: Pan de nueces
fr: Pains aux noix
hr: Kruhovi s orasima
it: Pane alle noci
nl: Notenbroden

fr: Pains multicéréales, Pains aux céréales
nl: Meergranenbroden

en: Breads mith malted grains
fr: Pains de céréales germées

en: Breads with corn
bg: Хляб с царевица
fr: Pains au maïs
hr: Kruhovi s kukuruzom
nl: Maisbroden

en: Bakery products
de: Backwaren
es: Productos de panadería
fr: Produits de boulangerie
hr: Pekarski proizvodi
it: Prodotti da forno
nl: Bakkerijproducten
pt: Produtos de padaria

en: Bakery product variety packs
de: Mischpackungen von Brot und Backwaren
es: Paquetes variados de productos de panadería y pan
fr: Assortiments de pains et produits de boulangerie
hr: Raznolika pakiranja pekarskih proizvoda
it: Confezioni miste di pane e prodotti da forno
nl: Assortimenten van brood- en bakkerijproducten
pt: Packs variados de pães y produtos de panificação